Missouri, session 2026, SB1680.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 208.247, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 208.247,
to read as follows:
208.247. 1. Pursuant to the option granted the state
by 21 U.S.C. Section 862a(d), an individual who has pled
guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty under
federal or state law of a felony involving possession, [or]
use, or manufacture of a controlled substance shall be
exempt from the prohibition contained in 21 U.S.C. Section
862a(a) against eligibility for food stamp program benefits
for such convictions, if such person, as determined by the
department:
(1) Meets one of the following criteria:
(a) Is currently successfully participating in a
substance abuse treatment program approved by the division
of alcohol and drug abuse within the department of mental
health; or
(b) Is currently accepted for treatment in and
participating in a substance abuse treatment program
approved by the division of alcohol and drug abuse, but is
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1680 2
subject to a waiting list to receive available treatment,
and the individual remains enrolled in the treatment program
and enters the treatment program at the first available
opportunity; or
(c) Has satisfactorily completed a substance abuse
treatment program approved by the division of alcohol and
drug abuse; or
(d) Is determined by a division of alcohol and drug
abuse certified treatment provider not to need substance
abuse treatment; and
(2) Is successfully complying with, or has already
complied with, all obligations imposed by the court, the
division of alcohol and drug abuse, and the division of
probation and parole; and
(3) Does not plead guilty or nolo contendere to or is
not found guilty of an additional controlled substance
misdemeanor or felony offense after release from custody or,
if not committed to custody, such person does not plead
guilty or nolo contendere to or is not found guilty of an
additional controlled substance misdemeanor or felony
offense, within one year after the date of conviction. Such
a plea or conviction within the first year after conviction
shall immediately disqualify the person for the exemption;
and
(4) Has demonstrated sobriety through voluntary
urinalysis testing paid for by the participant.
2. Eligibility based upon the factors in subsection 1
of this section shall be based upon documentary or other
evidence satisfactory to the department of social services,
and the applicant shall meet all other factors for program
eligibility.

SB 1680 3
3. The department of social services, in consultation
with the division of alcohol and drug abuse, shall
promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this section
including specifying criteria for determining active
participation in and completion of a substance abuse
treatment program.
4. The exemption under this section shall not apply to
an individual who has pled guilty or nolo contendere to or
is found guilty of two subsequent felony offenses involving
possession, [or] use, or manufacture of a controlled
substance after the date of the first controlled substance
felony conviction.
✓